Florida, session 2026, HB631.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 491.019, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
491.019 Licensure by endorsement; marriage and family
therapists.—The board shall issue a license to practice marriage
and family therapy to an applicant who meets all of the
following criteria:
(1) Submits a complete application.
(2) Submits the required application fee.
(3) Holds an active, unencumbered marriage and family
therapy license in good standing issued by another state, the
District of Columbia, or a territory of the United States and
provides proof of all mental health licenses held in any other
jurisdiction.
(4) Attests that he or she is not, at the time of
submission of the application, the subject of a disciplinary
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb631-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 631 2026
proceeding in a jurisdiction in which he or she holds a license
for reasons related to the practice of marriage and family
therapy.
(5) Has not had disciplinary action taken against him or
her in the 5 years immediately preceding the date of submission
of the application.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb631-00